Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.559

Energy efficiency revolving loan capitalization account.

The energy efficiency revolving loan capitalization account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the state from the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization grant program created in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) must be deposited into the account. The account may also receive legislative transfers and appropriations and all other revenues directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to make grants or loans, and to provide technical assistance, to conduct energy audits and to implement audit strategies to increase the energy efficiency of residential and commercial buildings and facilities.

[ 2022 c 296 s 7010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 296: See note following RCW 43.63A.125.